North Dakota, session 69, HB1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 39-06.1-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
A violation of section 39 - 10 - 71.1, a fee of one hundred dollars for a first violation, and five
hundred dollars for a second or subsequent violation except as provided under section
39 - 10 - 71.1 .
SECTION 2. Section 39-10-71.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
39 - 10 - 71.1. Motor vehicle owner's responsibility regarding a driver who flees a peace
officer - Exceptions .
1. The owner of a motor vehicle involved in a violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 is presumed to have
violated this section.
2. A peace officer may proceed in accordance with this section instead of pursuing the driver of a
motor vehicle who flees or attempts to elude the peace officer after being given a visual or
audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop in violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 .
a. A peace officer may investigate the violation and prepare a traffic citation under this
section.
b. A peace officer may issue a traffic citation under this section in accordance with the North
Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure to the motor vehicle owner within ninety - six hours after
observing the violation.
3. A motor vehicle owner may not be found to have violated this section if:
a. The driver operating the motor vehicle at the time of the violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 has
been charged with a violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 .
b. The motor vehicle was reported stolen before the violation occurred or within a
reasonable time after the violation occurred.
c. The motor vehicle owner assists or cooperates with a peace officer to demonstrate the
owner was not the one who operated the motor vehicle at the time and place of the
violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 .
d. The motor vehicle owner provides information that demonstrates the owner was not the
driver of the motor vehicle at the time of the offense.
4. A motor vehicle owner may not be found to have violated this section, and the lessee is
presumed to have violated this section, if the motor vehicle owner is a lessor of vehicles and

H. B. NO. 1229 - PAGE 2
at the time of the violation of section 39 - 10 - 71 the motor vehicle was in the possession of a
lessee, and the lessor provides a peace officer with the motor vehicle's registration number
and the name, address, and operator's license number of the individual renting or leasing the
motor vehicle.
5. An individual may not be charged both with violating this section and section 39 - 10 - 71 for acts
arising out of the same incident or occurrence.
6. This section may not apply to a motor vehicle rental company that rents motor vehicles to
customers for a period of ninety days or less.

H. B. NO. 1229 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1229.
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 14 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 29 Nays 16 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State